Utah statutes.
34A-2-204.   Compliance with chapter -- Notice to employees.
(1)  Each employer providing insurance, or electing directly to pay
compensation to the employer's injured workers, or the dependents of the
employer's killed employees, in accordance with this chapter and Chapter 3,
Utah Occupational Disease Act, shall post in conspicuous places about the
employer's place of business typewritten or printed notices stating, that:
(a) the employer has complied with this chapter and Chapter 3, Utah
Occupational Disease Act, and all the rules of the commission made under this
chapter and Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act; and
(b)  if such is the case, the employer has been authorized by the division
directly to compensate the employees or dependents.
(2)  The notice required in Subsection (1) when posted in accordance with
Subsection (1), shall constitute sufficient notice to the employer's employees
of the fact that the employer has complied with the law as to securing
compensation to the employer's employees and their dependents.
